Illinois, session 104th, SB1771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Securing All Futures through Equitable Reinvestment (SAFER) 6Communities Act. 7    Section 5. Intent. To reverse the trend of high 8unemployment among formerly incarcerated individuals and to 9spur the economic recovery of small businesses in Illinois, it 10is necessary to provide financial incentives for employers to 11create new, full-time jobs for individuals with felony 12conviction records.13    The intent of this Act is to facilitate the re-entry into 14society of formerly incarcerated individuals and to create 15financial incentives for employers that hire formerly 16incarcerated individuals. 17    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:18    "Average wage" means the average annual wage paid to 19individuals who are employed in the same occupation as the 20participant in the metropolitan or nonmetropolitan statistical 21area where the participant's primary job site is located. 22"Average annual wage" shall be determined by the Department   SB1771- 2 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1using the most recent data published by the Bureau of Labor 2Statistics of the United States Department of Labor in its 3Occupational Outlook Handbook, or any similar Bureau of Labor 4Statistics publication, as of the effective date of the 5agreement for wage reimbursement under this Act.6    "Barrier reduction funding" has the meaning given to that 7term in Section 605-415 of the Department of Commerce and 8Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 9Illinois.10    "Date of hire" means the first date on which a participant 11begins working for an employer as a full-time employee.12    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 13Opportunity.14    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity.16    "Disproportionately impacted area" means a census tract 17that is located in an R3 Area designated by the Restore, 18Reinvest, and Renew Program Board in accordance with Section 1910-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.20    "Employer" means an Illinois taxpayer that has an 21agreement with a Navigator to (i) hire at least one 22participant as a full-time employee and (ii) provide the 23employee with the knowledge or skills essential to the full 24and adequate performance of the job.25    "Full-time employee" means an individual who is employed 26for at least 30 hours each week in (i) a position that is   SB1771- 3 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1covered by a collective bargaining agreement between the union 2and an employer or (ii) a position for which the individual 3receives a wage that meets or exceeds the average wage for that 4occupation.5    "Navigator" means any one or more of the following 6entities that has demonstrated expertise and effectiveness in 7administering workforce development programs for formerly 8incarcerated participants and is certified by the Department 9as a Navigator: a private nonprofit or not-for-profit 10organization, an industry association, an administrative 11entity under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity 12Act, a community action agency, or a public or private 13educational institution.14    "Participant" means an individual who:15        (1) is an Illinois resident;16        (2) was an unemployed or underemployed individual 17    immediately before being hired by the employer;18        (3) served a sentence of incarceration in a State or 19    federal prison that (i) ends not more than 10 years before 20    the date the employee is accepted by a Navigator to 21    participate in the program and (ii) ends or is expected to 22    end no later than 12 months after the employee is accepted 23    by a Navigator to participate in the program; and24        (4) has been accepted by a Navigator to participate in 25    the program.26    "Program" means the Securing All Futures through Equitable   SB1771- 4 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1Reinvestment (SAFER) Communities Wage Reimbursement Pilot 2Program created in this Act.3    "Underemployed individual" means an individual who:4        (1) works part-time but desires full-time employment;5        (2) works for wages not commensurate with the 6    individual's demonstrated level of educational or skill 7    achievement; or8        (3) is employed and is eligible for assistance under 9    Section 6 of the Energy Assistance Act.10    "Unemployed individual" means an individual who is without 11a job and who wants and is available for work. The 12determination of whether an individual is without a job, for 13purposes of this definition, shall be made in accordance with 14the criteria used by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 15United States Department of Labor or as required by the 16relevant funding source and set forth in the Notice of Funding 17Opportunities.18    "Wage reimbursement" means the amount awarded by the 19Department to a Navigator to compensate the employer for the 20employer's costs of employment for each participant hired by 21the employer. 22    Section 15. Powers of the Department. The Department is 23granted and shall have all the powers necessary or convenient 24to carry out the purposes and provisions of this Act, 25including, but not limited to, the power and authority to:  SB1771- 5 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1        (1) adopt rules that are necessary and appropriate for 2    the administration of this Act;3        (2) establish forms for applications, notifications, 4    contracts, or any other agreements needed to implement 5    this Act;6        (3) accept applications for the program under this Act 7    at any time during the year and require that the 8    applications be submitted through the Internet or by any 9    other electronic means;10        (4) provide guidance and assistance to Navigators for 11    the purpose of carrying out this Act and cooperate with 12    Navigators to promote, foster, and support job creation in 13    the State;14        (5) enter into agreements and memoranda of 15    understanding with agencies of the federal government, 16    units of local government, universities, research 17    foundations or institutions, regional economic development 18    corporations, not-for-profit organizations, or other 19    organizations for the purpose of administering this Act;20        (6) gather information about Navigators for the 21    purpose of making any designations or certifications in 22    furtherance of the purposes of this Act;23        (7) provide for sufficient personnel to adequately 24    discharge the Department's duties and responsibilities 25    described in this Act from any funds appropriated by the 26    General Assembly for the administration of this Act; and  SB1771- 6 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1        (8) require Navigators, upon written request, to issue 2    any necessary authorization to the appropriate federal, 3    State, or local authority or any other person for the 4    release to the Department of information requested by the 5    Department, including, but not limited to, financial 6    reports, returns, or records relating to the Navigators or 7    to the amount of the wage reimbursement allowable under 8    this Act. 9    Section 20. Securing All Futures through Equitable 10Reinvestment (SAFER) Communities Wage Reimbursement Pilot 11Program. 12    (a) The Department shall, subject to appropriation, create 13a program to award grants to Navigators for the purposes 14described in this Section.15    (b) The Department shall award grants to Navigators for 16the following purposes:17        (1) providing wage reimbursements to employers that 18    hire participants, as provided in Sections 25 and 30;19        (2) collaborating with employers to support 20    participants who require on-the-job experience to gain job 21    skills, develop a work history, and begin a network for 22    entering the workforce; and23        (3) providing barrier reduction funding, including, 24    but not limited to, transportation, housing, child care, 25    and technology services to participants, as needed.  SB1771- 7 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1    (c) The Department may also award grants for the following 2purposes to Navigators who are eligible to receive grants 3under subsection (b):4        (1) establishing retention coaching programs that 5    support worker retention by continuing the services 6    described in subparagraph (3) of subsection (b) for one 7    year after job placement, as needed; and8        (2) supporting participants who aspire to participate 9    in additional workforce development, training, and 10    technical skills programs and opportunities.11    (d) Navigators shall use the Department's system of record 12to maintain a record of all participants who are eligible for 13the Program. Navigators shall verify each applicant's 14employment and conviction history to determine whether the 15applicant is eligible for participation in the program. 16Navigators shall notify applicants by email of the denial or 17approval of the application. Navigators may also send a 18physical copy of the denial or approval by first-class mail if 19the application indicates that email is not the applicant's 20preferred method of communication. Each denial letter issued 21under this subsection shall state the reason why the 22individual's application is being denied. Navigators shall 23submit to the Department a record of each applicant's denial 24or approval. Navigators shall email qualified participants an 25electronic certification of eligibility with details about the 26wage subsidy program, which the participant may present to a   SB1771- 8 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1prospective employer. The Navigator may also send a physical 2copy of the certification by first class mail if the 3application indicates that email is not the applicant's 4preferred method of communication. 5    Section 25. Eligibility and reporting. 6    (a) The Navigator shall enter into an agreement with the 7employer of an eligible participant to establish the general 8terms and conditions of wage reimbursements with respect to 9that participant. At a minimum, the agreement shall include:10        (1) the participant's name, social security number or 11    individual taxpayer identification number, job 12    description, and salary;13        (2) the physical address of the workplace at which the 14    participant is based;15        (3) the negotiated reimbursement rate for the wage the 16    Navigator would receive under this Act with respect to the 17    participant listed on the application; and18        (4) any other information required by the Department.19    (b) Wage reimbursements provided to employers must not 20directly or indirectly assist, promote, or deter union 21organizing.22    (c) Navigators shall submit monthly reports in the form 23and manner required by the Department that include the 24employment status of each participant.   SB1771- 9 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1    Section 30. Wage reimbursement. 2    (a) An employer may enter into a wage reimbursement 3agreement under Section 25 for each participant who is 4employed by the employer as a full-time employee for a full 5calendar month as of the date the agreement is entered into, 6provided that the following conditions are met:7        (1) the participant shall be provided benefits and 8    working conditions at the same level and to the same 9    extent as other employees who have been employed by the 10    employer for a similar length of time and do the same type 11    of work as the participant;12        (2) starting from the date of hire of the participant, 13    the employer shall maintain or increase its total number 14    of full-time Illinois employees; and15        (3) the employer shall pay the participant a wage 16    that, when annualized, meets or exceeds the average wage 17    paid by the employer to other employees who have been 18    employed by the employer for a similar length of time and 19    do the same type of work as the participant.20    (b) The wage reimbursement received by an employer shall 21be 50% of the wages earned by each participant as a result of 22his or her employment with the employer. However, if the 23participant's primary job site is located in a 24disproportionately impacted area, then the wage reimbursement 25shall be 75% of the wages earned by that participant. No 26employer shall receive a wage reimbursement for a particular   SB1771- 10 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1participant for more than 12 consecutive months. 2    Section 35. Data collection and reporting. For years in 3which it receives an appropriation for purposes of this Act, 4the Department shall make publicly available an annual report 5on the use, outcomes, and impact of the program described in 6this Act, including, but not limited to, the total number of 7participants hired under the program, disaggregated by 8categories of race, age, gender, hourly wage, length of job 9retention, recidivism status, job location by region, and 10employment industry. 11    Section 40. Awareness promotion of the pilot program. The 12Department of Corrections shall implement procedures to 13promote awareness and participation in the program among 14eligible persons, including, but not limited to, the 15following:16        (1) The Department of Corrections shall ensure that 17    the wardens or superintendents of all correctional 18    institutions and facilities visibly post information about 19    the availability and registration process for the program 20    in all common areas of their respective institutions, and 21    shall broadcast the same via in-house institutional 22    information television channels. The Department of 23    Corrections shall ensure that updated information is 24    distributed in a timely, visible, and accessible manner.  SB1771- 11 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1        (2) The Department of Corrections shall ensure that 2    each incarcerated individual, upon release as a committed 3    person on parole, mandatory supervised release, aftercare 4    release, final discharge, or pardon, shall be provided 5    with written information about the availability and 6    registration process for the program.7        (3) The Department of Corrections shall provide to 8    each parole office in this State information about the 9    availability and application process for the program, 10    which shall be posted in a visible and accessible manner.11        (4) The Department of Corrections shall distribute 12    written information about the availability and application 13    process for the program to the Community Support Advisory 14    Councils of the Department of Corrections for use in 15    re-entry programs across this State. 16    Section 45. Funding. The implementation of this Act is 17subject to appropriation. 18    Section 50. Rulemaking authority. Upon an appropriation 19for the Program, the Department may adopt rules that are 20necessary to implement and administer this Act.  21    Section 55. Repeal. This Act is repealed on December 31, 222035.   SB1771- 12 -LRB104 10492 SPS 20567 b1    Section 90. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 2amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 3    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)4    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; Securing All Futures 5through Equitable Reinvestment (SAFER) Communities Act. To 6provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of the 7Securing All Futures through Equitable Reinvestment (SAFER) 8Communities Act, emergency rules implementing that Act may be 9adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of 10Commerce and Economic Opportunity. The adoption of emergency 11rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to 12be necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.13    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 14of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.